LvLexKg21071.lexc
!Define all symbols consisting of multiple characters
Multichar_Symbols
        +N      ! Noun tag
        +Sg     ! Singular
        +Pl     ! Plural
        +Nom
        +Gen
        +Dat
        +Acc
        +Loc
        +W     ! Kopdzimte Women
        +M     ! Kopdzimte Man

!Define root lexicon
LEXICON Root
        Nouns ; ! No input, no output


!Define noun lexicon
LEXICON Nouns

!Parastie piemēri - 3gb katrai deklinācijai
kok N1dekl ;
krēsl N1dekl ;
sol N1dekl ;

las N2dekl ;
zut N2dekl ;
bried N2dekl ;

med N3dekl ;
led N3dekl ;
tirg N3dekl ;

māj N4dekl ;
mās N4dekl ;
dien N4dekl ;

egl N5dekl ;
krūz N5dekl ;
sēn N5dekl ;

pil N6dekl ;
kūt N6dekl ;
ac N6dekl ;




  !Iespraušanai
gulb N2dekl ;
kurm N2dekl ;
krup N2dekl ;
piekab N5dekl ;
zem N5dekl ;
virv N5dekl ;
pūzn N2dekl ;

  !Izņēmumi
akmen N2dekl ;

  !Daudzskatlinieki
bikse DSK;
šķēre DSK;
durvi DSK;
ļaudi DSK;

  !kopdzimte
bend N5dekl ;

! Define declension paradigms

LEXICON N1dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^s   # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^a   # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^am  # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^u   # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ā   # ;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^i   # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^u   # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^us  # ;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^os  # ;

LEXICON N2dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^is   # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^Ma   # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^im   # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^i    # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ī    # ;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^Mi   # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Mu   # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^Miem # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^Mus  # ;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^Mos  # ;

LEXICON N3dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^us  #;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^us  #;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^um  #;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^u   #;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ū   #;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^i   #;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^u   #;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^us  #;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^os  #;

LEXICON N4dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^a  #;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^as #;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^ai #;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^u  #;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ā  #;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^as #;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ām #;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^as #;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^ās #;

LEXICON N5dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^e   #;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^es  #;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^ei  #;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^i   #;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ē   #;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^es  #;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ēm  #;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^es  #;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^ēs  #;

LEXICON N6dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^s   #;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^s   #;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^ij  #;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^i   #;
    +N+Sg+Loc:^ī   #;
    +N+Pl+Nom:^is  #;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^īm  #;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^is  #;
    +N+Pl+Loc:^īs  #;

LEXICON DSK
        +N+Pl+Nom:^s  #;
        +N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
        +N+Pl+Dat:^Mm #;
        +N+Pl+Acc:^s #;
        +N+Pl+Loc:^Ms #;
